Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6131XS (5) 91 da/js S.F. 2259 Section 1. Section 459.303, subsection 1, paragraphs a and 1 b, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 2 a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , a person must obtain 3 a permit to construct any of the following: 4 (1) A confinement feeding operation structure if after 5 construction its confinement feeding operation would have an 6 animal unit capacity of at least one thousand more than three 7 hundred animal units. 8 (2) The confinement feeding operation structure is an 9 unformed manure storage structure. 10 b. A person is not required to obtain a permit to construct 11 a confinement feeding operation structure if any of the 12 following apply: the confinement feeding operation structure 13 is part of a confinement feeding operation that is owned by a 14 research college conducting research activities as provided in 15 section 459.318. 16 (1) The confinement feeding operation structure, if 17 constructed, would be part of a small animal feeding operation. 18 However, the person must obtain a permit under this section 19 if the confinement feeding operation structure is an unformed 20 manure storage structure. 21 (2) The confinement feeding operation structure is part of 22 a confinement feeding operation which is owned by a research 23 college conducting research activities as provided in section 24 459.318 . 25